Florida, session 2026, HB591.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
71
72 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
73 16.71, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
74 16.71 Florida Gaming Control Commission; creation;
75 meetings; membership.—
Page 3 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
76 (2) MEMBERSHIP.—
77 (a) The commission shall consist of five members appointed
78 by the Governor, and subject to confirmation by the Senate, for
79 terms of 4 years. Members of the commission must be appointed by
80 January 1, 2022. The Governor shall consider appointees who
81 reflect Florida's racial, ethnic, and gender diversity. Of the
82 initial five members appointed by the Governor, and immediately
83 upon appointment, the Governor shall appoint one of the members
84 as the initial chair and one of the members as the initial vice
85 chair. At the end of the initial chair's and vice chair's terms
86 pursuant to subparagraph 1., the commission shall elect one of
87 the members of the commission as chair and one of the members of
88 the commission as vice chair.
89 1. For the purpose of providing staggered terms, of the
90 initial appointments, two members shall be appointed to 4-year
91 terms, two members shall be appointed to 3-year terms, and one
92 member shall be appointed to a 2-year term.
93 2. Of the five members, at least one member must have at
94 least 10 years of experience in law enforcement and criminal
95 investigations, at least one member must be a certified public
96 accountant licensed in this state with at least 10 years of
97 experience in accounting and auditing, and at least one member
98 must be an attorney admitted and authorized to practice law in
99 this state for at least the preceding 10 years.
100 Section 2. Paragraph (i) of subsection (4) of section
Page 4 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
101 551.104, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
102 551.104 License to conduct slot machine gaming.—
103 (4) As a condition of licensure and to maintain continued
104 authority for the conduct of slot machine gaming, the slot
105 machine licensee shall:
106 (i) Create and file with the commission a written policy
107 for:
108 1. Creating opportunities to purchase from vendors in this
109 state, including minority vendors.
110 2. Creating opportunities for employment of residents of
111 this state, including minority residents.
112 3. Ensuring opportunities for construction services from a
113 small business as defined in s. 288.703 minority contractors.
114 4. Ensuring that opportunities for employment are offered
115 on an equal, nondiscriminatory basis.
116 5. Training for employees on responsible gaming and
117 working with a compulsive or addictive gambling prevention
118 program to further its purposes as provided for in s. 551.118.
119 6. The implementation of a drug-testing program that
120 includes, but is not limited to, requiring each employee to sign
121 an agreement that he or she understands that the slot machine
122 facility is a drug-free workplace.
123
124 The slot machine licensee shall use the Internet-based job-
125 listing system of the Department of Commerce in advertising
Page 5 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
126 employment opportunities. Each slot machine licensee shall
127 provide an annual report to the Florida Gaming Control
128 Commission containing information indicating compliance with
129 this paragraph in regard to minority persons.
130 Section 3. Section 838.12, Florida Statutes, is amended,
131 to read:
132 838.12 Bribery in athletic contests.—
133 (1) Whoever gives, promises, offers or conspires to give,
134 promise or offer, to anyone who participates or expects to
135 participate in any professional or amateur game, contest, match,
136 race or sport; or to any umpire, referee, judge or other
137 official of such game, contest, match, race or sport; or to any
138 owner, manager, coach or trainer of, or to any relative of, or
139 to any person having any direct, indirect, remote or possible
140 connection with, any team, individual, participant or
141 prospective participant in any such professional or amateur
142 game, contest, match, race or sport, or the officials aforesaid,
143 any bribe, money, goods, present, reward or any valuable thing
144 whatsoever, or any promise, contract or agreement whatsoever,
145 with intent to influence him or her or them to lose or cause to
146 be lost any game, contest, match, race or sport, or to limit his
147 or her or their or any person's or any team's margin of victory
148 in any game, contest, match, race, or sport, or to fix or throw
149 any game, contest, match, race or sport, commits shall be guilty
150 of a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
Page 6 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
151 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
152 (2) Any participant or prospective participant in any
153 professional or amateur game, contest, match, race or sport; or
154 any umpire, referee, judge or other official of such game,
155 contest, match, race or sport; or any owner, manager, coach or
156 trainer of, or any relative of, or any person having any direct,
157 indirect, remote or possible connection with, any team,
158 individual, participant or prospective participant in any such
159 professional or amateur game, contest, match, race or sport, or
160 the officials aforesaid; who in any way solicits, receives or
161 accepts, or agrees to receive or accept, or who conspires to
162 receive or accept, any bribe, money, goods, present, reward or
163 any valuable thing whatsoever, or any promise, contract or
164 agreement whatsoever, with intent to lose or cause to be lost
165 any game, contest, match, race or sport, or to limit his, her,
166 their or any person's or any team's margin of victory in any
167 game, contest, match, race or sport, or to fix or throw any
168 game, contest, match, race or sport, commits shall be guilty of
169 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
170 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
171 (3) A person who stakes, bets, or wagers any money or
172 other thing of value upon the result of any professional or
173 amateur game, contest, match, race, or sport with knowledge that
174 the results of such professional or amateur game, contest,
175 match, race, or sport are prearranged or predetermined as
Page 7 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
176 described in subsection (1) or subsection (2) commits a felony
177 of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
178 775.083, or s. 775.084.
179 Section 4. Section 843.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to
180 read:
181 843.08 False personation.—A person who falsely assumes or
182 pretends to be a firefighter, a sheriff, an officer of the
183 Florida Highway Patrol, an officer of the Fish and Wildlife
184 Conservation Commission, an officer of the Department of
185 Environmental Protection, an officer of the Department of
186 Financial Services, any personnel or representative of the
187 Division of Criminal Investigations, any personnel or
188 representative of the Florida Gaming Control Commission, an
189 officer of the Department of Corrections, a correctional
190 probation officer, a deputy sheriff, a state attorney or an
191 assistant state attorney, a statewide prosecutor or an assistant
192 statewide prosecutor, a state attorney investigator, a coroner,
193 a police officer, a lottery special agent or lottery
194 investigator, a beverage enforcement agent, a school guardian as
195 described in s. 30.15(1)(k), a security officer licensed under
196 chapter 493, any member of the Florida Commission on Offender
197 Review or any administrative aide or supervisor employed by the
198 commission, any personnel or representative of the Department of
199 Law Enforcement, or a federal law enforcement officer as defined
200 in s. 901.1505, and takes upon himself or herself to act as
Page 8 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
201 such, or to require any other person to aid or assist him or her
202 in a matter pertaining to the duty of any such officer, commits
203 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
204 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. However, a person who
205 falsely personates any such officer during the course of the
206 commission of a felony commits a felony of the second degree,
207 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
208 If the commission of the felony results in the death or personal
209 injury of another human being, the person commits a felony of
210 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
211 775.083, or s. 775.084. In determining whether a defendant has
212 violated this section, the court or jury may consider any
213 relevant evidence, including, but not limited to, whether the
214 defendant used lights in violation of s. 316.2397 or s. 843.081.
215 Section 5. Section 849.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to
216 read:
217 849.01 Keeping gambling houses, etc.—Whoever by herself or
218 himself, her or his servant, clerk or agent, or in any other
219 manner has, keeps, exercises or maintains a gaming table or
220 room, or gaming implements or apparatus, or house, booth, tent,
221 shelter or other place for the purpose of gaming or gambling or
222 in any place of which she or he may directly or indirectly have
223 charge, control or management, either exclusively or with
224 others, procures, suffers or permits any person to play for
225 money or other valuable thing at any game whatever, whether
Page 9 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
226 heretofore prohibited or not, commits a felony misdemeanor of
227 the third second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082,
228 or s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
229 Section 6. Section 849.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to
230 read:
231 849.02 Agents or employees of keeper of gambling house.—A
232 person who Whoever acts as servant, clerk, agent, or employee of
233 any person in the violation of s. 849.01 commits:
234 (1) For a first offense, a misdemeanor of the first
235 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
236 (2) For a second offense, a felony of the third degree,
237 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
238 (3) For a third or subsequent offense, a felony of the
239 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
240 or s. 775.084 shall be punished in the manner and to the extent
241 therein mentioned.
242 Section 7. Section 849.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to
243 read:
244 849.03 Renting house for gambling purposes.—A person who
245 Whoever, whether as owner or agent, knowingly rents to another a
246 house, room, booth, tent, shelter or place for the purpose of
247 gaming commits:
248 (1) For a first offense, a felony of the third degree,
249 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084
250 shall be punished in the manner and to the extent mentioned in
Page 10 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
251 s. 849.01.
252 (2) For a second or subsequent violation, a felony of the
253 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
254 or s. 775.084.
255 Section 8. Section 849.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to
256 read:
257 849.08 Gambling.—
258 (1) As used in this section, the term:
259 (a) "Internet gambling" means to play or engage in any
260 game in which money or other thing of value is awarded based on
261 chance, regardless of any application of skill, that is
262 available on the Internet and accessible on a mobile device,
263 computer terminal, or other similar access device and simulates
264 casino-style gaming, including, but not limited to, slot
265 machines, video poker, and table games.
266 (b) "Internet sports wagering" means to stake, bet, or
267 wager any money or other thing of value upon the result of any
268 trial or contest of skill, speed, power, or endurance of human
269 or beast that is available on the Internet and accessible on a
270 mobile device, computer terminal, or other similar access
271 device.
272 (2) A person who Whoever plays or engages in Internet
273 gambling, any game at cards, keno, roulette, faro or other game
274 of chance, at any place, by any device whatever, for money or
275 other thing of value, commits shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
Page 11 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
276 of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
277 775.083.
278 (3) A person who plays or engages in Internet sports
279 wagering commits:
280 (a) For a first offense, a misdemeanor of the second
281 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
282 (b) For a second or subsequent violation, a misdemeanor of
283 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
284 775.083.
285 (4) A person who operates, conducts, or promotes Internet
286 gambling or Internet sports wagering, or receives in any manner
287 whatsoever any money or other thing of value offered for the
288 purpose of Internet gambling or Internet sports wagering, or
289 whoever knowingly becomes the custodian or depositary of any
290 money or other thing of value so offered, or whoever aids,
291 assists, abets, or influences in any manner in any of such acts,
292 all of which are hereby forbidden, commits a felony of the third
293 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
294 775.084.
295 (5) This section does not apply to participation in, or
296 the conduct of, any gaming activities authorized under s.
297 285.710(13) and conducted pursuant to a gaming compact ratified
298 and approved under s. 285.710(3).
299 Section 9. Paragraph (e) is added to subsection (12) of
300 section 849.086, Florida Statutes, to read:
Page 12 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
301 849.086 Cardrooms authorized.—
302 (12) PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES.—
303 (e) A person who manipulates or attempts to manipulate the
304 playing cards, outcome, or payoff of a card game in a licensed
305 cardroom by physical tampering or by use of any object,
306 instrument, or device, whether mechanical, electrical, magnetic,
307 or involving other means, commits a felony of the third degree,
308 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
309 Section 10. Section 849.11, Florida Statutes, is amended
310 to read:
311 849.11 Plays at games of chance by lot.—
312 (1) A person who Whoever sets up, promotes or plays in
313 person or by the use, at least in part, of the Internet, at any
314 game of chance by lot or with dice, cards, numbers, hazards or
315 any other gambling device whatever for, or for the disposal of
316 money or other thing of value or under the pretext of a sale,
317 gift or delivery thereof, or for any right, share or interest
318 therein, commits shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second
319 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
320 (2) A person who sets up, operates, conducts, promotes, or
321 receives in any manner whatsoever any money or other thing of
322 value offered for the purpose of conduct prohibited in
323 subsection (1), or whoever knowingly becomes the custodian or
324 depositary of any money or other thing of value so offered, or
325 whoever aids, assists, abets, or influences in any manner in any
Page 13 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
326 of such acts, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable
327 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
328 Section 11. Section 849.13, Florida Statutes, is amended
329 to read:
330 849.13 Punishment on Second or subsequent conviction.—A
331 person who commits a second or subsequent violation of the same
332 Whoever, after being convicted of an offense forbidden by law in
333 connection with lotteries for which there is no penalty
334 specified for a second or subsequent violation, shall have the
335 offense reclassified to an offense of the next higher degree,
336 commits the like offense, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of
337 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, or s.
338 775.083, or s. 775.084. For purposes of sentencing under chapter
339 921, a felony offense that is reclassified under this subsection
340 is ranked one level above the ranking under s. 921.0022 or s.
341 921.0023 of the felony offense committed.
342 Section 12. Section 849.14, Florida Statutes, is amended
343 to read:
344 849.14 Unlawful to bet on result of trial or contest of
345 skill, etc.—A person who Whoever stakes, bets, or wagers any
346 money or other thing of value upon the result of any trial or
347 contest of skill, speed or power or endurance of human or beast,
348 or whoever receives in any manner whatsoever any money or other
349 thing of value staked, bet, or wagered, or offered for the
350 purpose of being staked, bet, or wagered, by or for any other
Page 14 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
351 person upon any such result, or whoever knowingly becomes the
352 custodian or depositary of any money or other thing of value so
353 staked, bet, or wagered upon any such result, or whoever aids,
354 or assists, or abets, or influences in any manner in any of such
355 acts all of which are hereby forbidden, commits a felony of the
356 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, or s.
357 775.083, or s. 775.084.
358 Section 13. Section 849.15, Florida Statutes, is amended
359 to read:
360 849.15 Manufacture, sale, possession, etc., of slot
361 machines or devices prohibited.—
362 (1) As used in this section, the term:
363 (a) "Conviction" means a determination of guilt that is
364 the result of a plea or a trial, regardless of whether
365 adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is
366 entered.
367 (b) "Person of authority" means a person who, at any
368 business, establishment, premises, or other location at which a
369 slot machine or device is offered for play, has:
370 1. Actual authority to act on behalf of the business,
371 establishment, premises, or other location where a slot machine
372 or device is offered for play; or
373 2. Any ownership interest in the business, establishment,
374 premises, or other location. The term "ownership interest"
375 includes being an officer, director, or managing member of the
Page 15 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
376 business, establishment, premises, or other location.
377 (2)(1) It is unlawful:
378 (a) To manufacture, own, store, keep, possess, sell, rent,
379 lease, let on shares, lend or give away, transport, or expose
380 for sale or lease, or to offer to sell, rent, lease, let on
381 shares, lend or give away, or permit the operation of, or for
382 any person to permit to be placed, maintained, or used or kept
383 in any room, space, or building owned, leased or occupied by the
384 person or under the person's management or control, any slot
385 machine or device or any part thereof; or
386 (b) To make or to permit to be made with any person any
387 agreement with reference to any slot machine or device, pursuant
388 to which the user thereof, as a result of any element of chance
389 or other outcome unpredictable to him or her, may become
390 entitled to receive any money, credit, allowance, or thing of
391 value or additional chance or right to use such machine or
392 device, or to receive any check, slug, token or memorandum
393 entitling the holder to receive any money, credit, allowance or
394 thing of value.
395 (3)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c), a
396 person who violates subsection (2) commits a misdemeanor of the
397 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
398 775.083.
399 (b) A person commits a felony of the third degree,
400 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084,
Page 16 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
401 if he or she violates subsection (2), and:
402 1. At the time of the violation, the person was a person
403 of authority; or
404 2. The person has one prior conviction for a violation of
405 this section.
406 (c) A person commits a felony of the second degree,
407 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084,
408 if he or she violates subsection (2), and:
409 1.a. At the time of the violation, the person was a person
410 of authority; and
411 b. The violation involves five or more slot machines or
412 devices; or
413 2. The person has two or more prior convictions for a
414 violation of this section.
415 (4)(2) Pursuant to section 2 of that chapter of the
416 Congress of the United States entitled "An act to prohibit
417 transportation of gaming devices in interstate and foreign
418 commerce," approved January 2, 1951, being ch. 1194, 64 Stat.
419 1134, and also designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, the State
420 of Florida, acting by and through the duly elected and qualified
421 members of its Legislature, does hereby in this section, and in
422 accordance with and in compliance with the provisions of section
423 2 of such chapter of Congress, declare and proclaim that any
424 county of the State of Florida within which slot machine gaming
425 is authorized pursuant to chapter 551 is exempt from the
Page 17 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
426 provisions of section 2 of that chapter of the Congress of the
427 United States entitled "An act to prohibit transportation of
428 gaming devices in interstate and foreign commerce," designated
429 as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, approved January 2, 1951. All
430 shipments of gaming devices, including slot machines, into any
431 county of this state within which slot machine gaming is
432 authorized pursuant to chapter 551 and the registering,
433 recording, and labeling of which have been duly performed by the
434 manufacturer or distributor thereof in accordance with sections
435 3 and 4 of that chapter of the Congress of the United States
436 entitled "An act to prohibit transportation of gaming devices in
437 interstate and foreign commerce," approved January 2, 1951,
438 being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1134, and also designated as 15 U.S.C.
439 ss. 1171-1177, shall be deemed legal shipments thereof into this
440 state provided the destination of such shipments is an eligible
441 facility as defined in s. 551.102 or the facility of a slot
442 machine manufacturer or slot machine distributor as provided in
443 s. 551.109(2)(a).
444 (5) All shipments of legal gaming devices, including legal
445 slot machines, into Indian lands located within the state shall
446 be deemed legal shipments thereof provided that such Indian
447 lands are held in federal trust for the benefit of a federally
448 recognized Indian tribe that is a party to a tribal-state
449 compact with the state pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming
450 Regulatory Act of 1988, 18 U.S.C. ss. 1166-1168 and 25 U.S.C.
Page 18 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
451 ss. 2701 et seq.
452 Section 14. Section 849.155, Florida Statutes, is created
453 to read:
454 849.155 Trafficking in slot machines, devices, or parts.—
455 Any person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures,
456 transports, delivers, or brings into this state more than 15
457 slot machines or devices or any parts thereof commits a felony
458 of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
459 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the quantity of slot machines or
460 devices or any parts thereof involved is:
461 (1) More than 15 slot machines or devices or any parts
462 thereof, but less than 25 slot machines or devices or any parts
463 thereof, such person must be fined $100,000.
464 (2) Twenty-five slot machines or devices or any parts
465 thereof or more, but less than 50 slot machines or devices or
466 any parts thereof, such person must be fined $250,000.
467 (3) Fifty slot machines or devices or any parts thereof or
468 more, such person must be fined $500,000.
469 (4) Pursuant to section 2 of the chapter of the Congress
470 of the United States entitled "An act to prohibit transportation
471 of gaming devices in interstate and foreign commerce," approved
472 January 2, 1951, being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1134, and also
473 designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, the State of Florida,
474 acting by and through the duly elected and qualified members of
475 its Legislature, does hereby in this section, and in accordance
Page 19 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
476 with and in compliance with the provisions of s. 2 of such
477 chapter of Congress, declare and proclaim that any county of the
478 State of Florida within which slot machine gaming is authorized
479 pursuant to chapter 551 is exempt from the provisions of s. 2 of
480 that chapter of the Congress of the United States entitled "An
481 act to prohibit transportation of gaming devices in interstate
482 and foreign commerce," designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177,
483 approved January 2, 1951. All shipments of gaming devices,
484 including slot machines, into any county of this state within
485 which slot machine gaming is authorized pursuant to chapter 551
486 and the registering, recording, and labeling of which have been
487 duly performed by the manufacturer or distributor thereof in
488 accordance with ss. 3 and 4 of that chapter of the Congress of
489 the United States entitled "An act to prohibit transportation of
490 gaming devices in interstate and foreign commerce," approved
491 January 2, 1951, being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1134, and also
492 designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, shall be deemed legal
493 shipments thereof into this state provided the destination of
494 such shipments is an eligible facility as defined in s. 551.102
495 or the facility of a slot machine manufacturer or slot machine
496 distributor as provided in s. 551.109(2)(a).
497 (5) All shipments of legal gaming devices, including legal
498 slot machines, into Indian lands located within the state shall
499 be deemed legal shipments thereof provided that such Indian
500 lands are held in federal trust for the benefit of a federally
Page 20 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
501 recognized Indian tribe that is a party to a tribal-state
502 compact with the state pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming
503 Regulatory Act of 1988, 18 U.S.C. ss. 1166-1168 and 25 U.S.C.
504 ss. 2701 et seq.
505
506 Notwithstanding any other law, all fines imposed and collected
507 pursuant to this section must be deposited into the Pari-mutuel
508 Wagering Trust Fund and may be used for the enforcement of
509 chapters 546, 550, 551, and this chapter by the Florida Gaming
510 Control Commission.
511 Section 15. Section 849.157, Florida Statutes, is created
512 to read:
513 849.157 Making a false or misleading statement regarding
514 the legality of slot machines or devices to facilitate sale.—
515 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), a person who
516 knowingly and willfully makes a materially false or misleading
517 statement or who knowingly and willfully disseminates false or
518 misleading information regarding the legality of a slot machine
519 or device for the purpose of facilitating the sale or delivery
520 of a slot machine or device for any money or other valuable
521 consideration commits a felony of the third degree, punishable
522 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
523 (2) A person who violates subsection (1) when such a
524 violation involves the sale or delivery, or attempted sale or
525 delivery, of five or more slot machines or devices commits a
Page 21 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
526 felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
527 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
528 Section 16. Section 849.23, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
529 Section 17. Section 849.47, Florida Statutes, is created
530 to read:
531 849.47 Transporting or procuring the transportation of
532 persons to facilitate illegal gambling.—
533 (1) As used in this section, the term "illegal gambling"
534 means any criminal violation of chapter 546, chapter 550,
535 chapter 551, or this chapter that occurs at any business,
536 establishment, premises, or other location.
537 (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), a person who
538 knowingly and willfully transports, or procures the
539 transportation of, five or more other persons into or within
540 this state when he or she knows or reasonably should know that
541 such transportation is for the purpose of facilitating illegal
542 gambling commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable
543 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
544 (3)(a) A person who transports, or procures the
545 transportation of, a minor or a person 65 years of age or older
546 in violation of subsection (2) commits a felony of the third
547 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
548 775.084.
549 (b) A person who transports, or procures the
550 transportation of, 12 or more persons in violation of subsection
Page 22 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
551 (2) commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided
552 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
553 Section 18. Section 849.48, Florida Statutes, is created
554 to read:
555 849.48 Gambling or gaming advertisements; prohibited.—
556 (1) As used in this section, the term "illegal gambling"
557 means any criminal violation of chapter 546, chapter 550,
558 chapter 551, or this chapter which occurs at any business,
559 establishment, premises, or other location.
560 (2)(a) Except as otherwise specifically authorized by law,
561 a person may not knowingly and intentionally make, publish,
562 disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause,
563 directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated,
564 circulated, or placed before the public in this state, in any
565 manner, whether in person or by the use, at least in part, of
566 the Internet, any advertisement, circular, bill, poster,
567 pamphlet, list, schedule, announcement, or notice for the
568 purpose of promoting or facilitating illegal gambling.
569 (b) Except as otherwise specifically authorized by law, a
570 person may not set up any type or plate for any type of
571 advertisement, circular, bill, poster, pamphlet, list, schedule,
572 announcement, or notice when he or she knows or reasonably
573 should know that such material will be used for the purpose of
574 promoting or facilitating illegal gambling.
575 (c) A person who violates the subsection commits:
Page 23 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
576 1. For a first offense, a misdemeanor of the first degree,
577 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
578 2. For a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the
579 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
580 or s. 775.084.
581 (3) This section does not prohibit the printing or
582 producing of any advertisement, circular, bill, poster,
583 pamphlet, list, schedule, announcement, or notice to be used for
584 the purpose of promoting or facilitating gambling conducted in
585 any other state or nation, outside of this state, where such
586 gambling is not prohibited.
587 Section 19. Section 849.49, Florida Statutes, is created
588 to read:
589 849.49 Preemption.—No county, municipality, or other
590 political subdivision of the state shall enact or enforce any
591 ordinance or local rule relating to gaming, gambling, lotteries,
592 or any activities described in s. 546.10 or this chapter, except
593 as otherwise expressly provided by the State Constitution,
594 general law, or special law.
595 Section 20. Paragraphs (i) through (m) of subsection (2)
596 of section 903.046, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
597 paragraphs (j) through (n), respectively, and a new paragraph
598 (i) is added to that subsection, to read:
599 903.046 Purpose of and criteria for bail determination.—
600 (2) When determining whether to release a defendant on
Page 24 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
601 bail or other conditions, and what that bail or those conditions
602 may be, the court shall consider:
603 (i) The amount of currency seized that is connected to or
604 involved in a violation of chapter 546, chapter 550, chapter
605 551, or chapter 849.
606 Section 21. Paragraphs (a), (c), (e), and (g) of
607 subsection (3) of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are
608 amended to read:
609 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
610 ranking chart.—
611 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
612 (a) LEVEL 1
613
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
614
24.118(3)(a) 3rd Counterfeit or altered state
lottery ticket.
615
104.0616(2) 3rd Unlawfully distributing,
ordering, requesting,
collecting, delivering, or
possessing vote-by-mail
ballots.
616
Page 25 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
212.054(2)(b) 3rd Discretionary sales surtax;
limitations, administration,
and collection.
617
212.15(2)(b) 3rd Failure to remit sales taxes,
amount $1,000 or more but less
than $20,000.
618
316.1935(1) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude
law enforcement officer.
619
319.30(5) 3rd Sell, exchange, give away
certificate of title or
identification number plate.
620
319.35(1)(a) 3rd Tamper, adjust, change, etc.,
an odometer.
621
320.26(1)(a) 3rd Counterfeit, manufacture, or
sell registration license
plates or validation stickers.
622
322.212 3rd Possession of forged, stolen,
(1)(a)-(c) counterfeit, or unlawfully
issued driver license;
Page 26 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
possession of simulated
identification.
623
322.212(4) 3rd Supply or aid in supplying
unauthorized driver license or
identification card.
624
322.212(5)(a) 3rd False application for driver
license or identification card.
625
414.39(3)(a) 3rd Fraudulent misappropriation of
public assistance funds by
employee/official, value more
than $200.
626
443.071(1) 3rd False statement or
representation to obtain or
increase reemployment
assistance benefits.
627
509.151(1) 3rd Defraud an innkeeper, food or
lodging value $1,000 or more.
628
517.302(1) 3rd Violation of the Florida
Securities and Investor
Page 27 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
Protection Act.
629
713.69 3rd Tenant removes property upon
which lien has accrued, value
$1,000 or more.
630
812.014(3)(c) 3rd Petit theft (3rd conviction);
theft of any property not
specified in subsection (2).
631
815.04(4)(a) 3rd Offense against intellectual
property (i.e., computer
programs, data).
632
817.52(2) 3rd Hiring with intent to defraud,
motor vehicle services.
633
817.569(2) 3rd Use of public record or public
records information or
providing false information to
facilitate commission of a
felony.
634
826.01 3rd Bigamy.
635
Page 28 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
828.122(3) 3rd Fighting or baiting animals.
636
831.04(1) 3rd Any erasure, alteration, etc.,
of any replacement deed, map,
plat, or other document listed
in s. 92.28.
637
831.31(1)(a) 3rd Sell, deliver, or possess
counterfeit controlled
substances, all but s.
893.03(5) drugs.
638
832.041(1) 3rd Stopping payment with intent to
defraud $150 or more.
639
832.05(2)(b) & 3rd Knowing, making, issuing
(4)(c) worthless checks $150 or more
or obtaining property in return
for worthless check $150 or
more.
640
838.15(2) 3rd Commercial bribe receiving.
641
838.16 3rd Commercial bribery.
642
Page 29 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
843.18 3rd Fleeing by boat to elude a law
enforcement officer.
643
847.011(1)(a) 3rd Sell, distribute, etc.,
obscene, lewd, etc., material
(2nd conviction).
644
849.09(1)(a)-(d) 3rd Lottery; set up, promote, etc.,
or assist therein, conduct or
advertise drawing for prizes,
or dispose of property or money
by means of lottery.
645
849.23 3rd Gambling-related machines;
"common offender" as to
property rights.
646
849.25(2) 3rd Engaging in bookmaking.
647
860.08 3rd Interfere with a railroad
signal.
648
860.13(1)(a) 3rd Operate aircraft while under
the influence.
649
Page 30 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
893.13(2)(a)2. 3rd Purchase of cannabis.
650
893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of cannabis (more
than 20 grams).
651
934.03(1)(a) 3rd Intercepts, or procures any
other person to intercept, any
wire or oral communication.
652
653 (c) LEVEL 3
654
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
655
119.10(2)(b) 3rd Unlawful use of confidential
information from police
reports.
656
316.066 3rd Unlawfully obtaining or using
(3)(b)-(d) confidential crash reports.
657
316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 3rd conviction.
658
316.1935(2) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude
law enforcement officer in
Page 31 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
patrol vehicle with siren and
lights activated.
659
319.30(4) 3rd Possession by junkyard of motor
vehicle with identification
number plate removed.
660
319.33(1)(a) 3rd Alter or forge any certificate
of title to a motor vehicle or
mobile home.
661
319.33(1)(c) 3rd Procure or pass title on stolen
vehicle.
662
319.33(4) 3rd With intent to defraud,
possess, sell, etc., a blank,
forged, or unlawfully obtained
title or registration.
663
327.35(2)(b) 3rd Felony BUI.
664
328.05(2) 3rd Possess, sell, or counterfeit
fictitious, stolen, or
fraudulent titles or bills of
sale of vessels.
Page 32 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
665
328.07(4) 3rd Manufacture, exchange, or
possess vessel with counterfeit
or wrong ID number.
666
376.302(5) 3rd Fraud related to reimbursement
for cleanup expenses under the
Inland Protection Trust Fund.
667
379.2431 3rd Taking, disturbing, mutilating,
(1)(e)5. destroying, causing to be
destroyed, transferring,
selling, offering to sell,
molesting, or harassing marine
turtles, marine turtle eggs, or
marine turtle nests in
violation of the Marine Turtle
Protection Act.
668
379.2431 3rd Possessing any marine turtle
(1)(e)6. species or hatchling, or parts
thereof, or the nest of any
marine turtle species described
in the Marine Turtle Protection
Act.
Page 33 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
669
379.2431 3rd Soliciting to commit or
(1)(e)7. conspiring to commit a
violation of the Marine Turtle
Protection Act.
670
400.9935(4)(a) 3rd Operating a clinic, or offering
or (b) services requiring licensure,
without a license.
671
400.9935(4)(e) 3rd Filing a false license
application or other required
information or failing to
report information.
672
440.1051(3) 3rd False report of workers'
compensation fraud or
retaliation for making such a
report.
673
501.001(2)(b) 2nd Tampers with a consumer product
or the container using
materially false/misleading
information.
674
Page 34 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
624.401(4)(a) 3rd Transacting insurance without a
certificate of authority.
675
624.401(4)(b)1. 3rd Transacting insurance without a
certificate of authority;
premium collected less than
$20,000.
676
626.902(1)(a) & 3rd Representing an unauthorized
(b) insurer.
677
697.08 3rd Equity skimming.
678
790.15(3) 3rd Person directs another to
discharge firearm from a
vehicle.
679
794.053 3rd Lewd or lascivious written
solicitation of a person 16 or
17 years of age by a person 24
years of age or older.
680
800.045(3) 3rd Possess, control, or
intentionally view any
photographic material, motion
Page 35 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
picture, etc., which includes a
lewd or lascivious image.
681
806.10(1) 3rd Maliciously injure, destroy, or
interfere with vehicles or
equipment used in firefighting.
682
806.10(2) 3rd Interferes with or assaults
firefighter in performance of
duty.
683
810.09(2)(b) 3rd Trespass on property other than
structure or conveyance armed
with firearm or dangerous
weapon.
684
810.145(2)(c) 3rd Digital voyeurism; 19 years of
age or older.
685
812.014(2)(c)2. 3rd Grand theft; $5,000 or more but
less than $10,000.
686
812.0145(2)(c) 3rd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $300 or more but
less than $10,000.
Page 36 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
687
812.015(8)(b) 3rd Retail theft with intent to
sell; conspires with others.
688
812.081(2) 3rd Theft of a trade secret.
689
815.04(4)(b) 2nd Computer offense devised to
defraud or obtain property.
690
817.034(4)(a)3. 3rd Engages in scheme to defraud
(Florida Communications Fraud
Act), property valued at less
than $20,000.
691
817.233 3rd Burning to defraud insurer.
692
817.234 3rd Unlawful solicitation of
(8)(b) & (c) persons involved in motor
vehicle accidents.
693
817.234(11)(a) 3rd Insurance fraud; property value
less than $20,000.
694
817.236 3rd Filing a false motor vehicle
insurance application.
Page 37 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
695
817.2361 3rd Creating, marketing, or
presenting a false or
fraudulent motor vehicle
insurance card.
696
817.413(2) 3rd Sale of used goods of $1,000 or
more as new.
697
817.49(2)(b)1. 3rd Willful making of a false
report of a crime causing great
bodily harm, permanent
disfigurement, or permanent
disability.
698
831.28(2)(a) 3rd Counterfeiting a payment
instrument with intent to
defraud or possessing a
counterfeit payment instrument
with intent to defraud.
699
831.29 2nd Possession of instruments for
counterfeiting driver licenses
or identification cards.
700
Page 38 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
836.13(2) 3rd Generating an altered sexual
depiction of an identifiable
person without consent.
701
836.13(4) 3rd Promoting, or possessing with
intent to promote, an altered
sexual depiction of an
identifiable person without
consent.
702
838.021(3)(b) 3rd Threatens unlawful harm to
public servant.
703
838.12(3) 3rd Betting on a predetermined or
prearranged professional or
amateur game, contest, match,
race, or sport.
704
849.01 3rd Keeping a gambling house.
705
849.02(2) 3rd Agents or employees of keeper
of gambling house.
706
849.03(1) 3rd Renting house for gambling
Page 39 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
purposes.
707
849.08(4) 3rd Operating, conducting,
promoting, aiding, abetting,
assisting Internet gambling and
Internet sports wagering.
708
849.086(12)(e) 3rd Tampering with cards or card
games.
709
849.09(1)(a)-(d) 3rd Lottery; set up, promote, etc.,
or assist therein, conduct or
advertise drawing for prizes,
or dispose of property or money
by means of lottery.
710
849.09(1)(e), 3rd Conducting an unlawful lottery;
(f), (g), (i), second or subsequent offense.
or (k)
711
849.09(1)(h) or 3rd Conducting an unlawful lottery;
(j) second or subsequent offense.
712
849.11(2) 3rd Offenses relating to games of
Page 40 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
chance.
713
849.14 3rd Betting on result of trial or
contest of skill, etc.
714
849.15(3)(b) 3rd Manufacture, sale, or
possession of slot machine; by
person of authority or with
prior conviction.
715
849.157(1) 3rd False or misleading statement
to facilitate sale of slot
machines or devices.
716
849.25(2) 3rd Engaging in bookmaking.
717
849.47(3)(a) & 3rd Transporting persons to
(b) facilitate illegal gambling;
minor, person 65 years of age
or older, or 12 or more
persons.
718
849.48(2)(c) 3rd Illegal gambling advertising.
719
Page 41 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
847.01385 3rd Harmful communication to a
minor.
720
860.15(3) 3rd Overcharging for repairs and
parts.
721
870.01(2) 3rd Riot.
722
870.01(4) 3rd Inciting a riot.
723
893.13(1)(a)2. 3rd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs).
724
893.13(1)(d)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs
within 1,000 feet of
university.
725
Page 42 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
893.13(1)(f)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs
within 1,000 feet of public
housing facility.
726
893.13(4)(c) 3rd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substances.
727
893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of any controlled
substance other than felony
possession of cannabis.
728
893.13(7)(a)8. 3rd Withhold information from
practitioner regarding previous
receipt of or prescription for
a controlled substance.
729
893.13(7)(a)9. 3rd Obtain or attempt to obtain
controlled substance by fraud,
forgery, misrepresentation,
etc.
Page 43 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
730
893.13(7)(a)10. 3rd Affix false or forged label to
package of controlled
substance.
731
893.13(7)(a)11. 3rd Furnish false or fraudulent
material information on any
document or record required by
chapter 893.
732
893.13(8)(a)1. 3rd Knowingly assist a patient,
other person, or owner of an
animal in obtaining a
controlled substance through
deceptive, untrue, or
fraudulent representations in
or related to the
practitioner's practice.
733
893.13(8)(a)2. 3rd Employ a trick or scheme in the
practitioner's practice to
assist a patient, other person,
or owner of an animal in
obtaining a controlled
substance.
Page 44 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
734
893.13(8)(a)3. 3rd Knowingly write a prescription
for a controlled substance for
a fictitious person.
735
893.13(8)(a)4. 3rd Write a prescription for a
controlled substance for a
patient, other person, or an
animal if the sole purpose of
writing the prescription is a
monetary benefit for the
practitioner.
736
918.13(1) 3rd Tampering with or fabricating
physical evidence.
737
944.47 3rd Introduce contraband to
(1)(a)1. & 2. correctional facility.
738
944.47(1)(c) 2nd Possess contraband while upon
the grounds of a correctional
institution.
739
985.721 3rd Escapes from a juvenile
facility (secure detention or
Page 45 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
residential commitment
facility).
740
741 (e) LEVEL 5
742
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
743
316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal
injuries other than serious
bodily injury, failure to stop;
leaving scene.
744
316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
745
316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel;
obtaining fuel fraudulently.
746
322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor
vehicle with suspended license,
Page 46 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
resulting in death or serious
bodily injury.
747
327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving
personal injuries other than
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
748
365.172 2nd Misuse of emergency
(14)(b)2. communications system resulting
in death.
749
379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to:
willful molestation of stone
crab traps, lines, or buoys;
illegal bartering, trading, or
sale, conspiring or aiding in
such barter, trade, or sale, or
supplying, agreeing to supply,
aiding in supplying, or giving
away stone crab trap tags or
certificates; making, altering,
forging, counterfeiting, or
reproducing stone crab trap
tags; possession of forged,
Page 47 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
counterfeit, or imitation stone
crab trap tags; and engaging in
the commercial harvest of stone
crabs while license is
suspended or revoked.
750
379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a
commercial harvester's spiny
lobster trap, line, or buoy.
751
379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more
undersized spiny lobsters.
752
381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs
knowing HIV positive.
753
440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workers'
compensation coverage.
754
440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the
purpose of making workers'
compensation claims.
755
440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false,
misleading, or incomplete
Page 48 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
information with the purpose of
avoiding or reducing workers'
compensation premiums.
756
624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a
certificate or authority;
premium collected $20,000 or
more but less than $100,000.
757
626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized
insurer; repeat offender.
758
790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a
concealed firearm.
759
790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge
destructive device.
760
790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, or use of firearms
in violent manner.
761
790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled
shotgun or machine gun.
Page 49 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
762
790.23 2nd Felons in possession of
firearms, ammunition, or
electronic weapons or devices.
763
796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 1st offense.
764
800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender less than 18 years of
age.
765
800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
766
806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or
dispense fire bomb with intent
to damage any structure or
property.
767
810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism
dissemination.
768
810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or
Page 50 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
subsequent offense.
769
810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims.
770
812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft
from 20 or more dwellings or
their unenclosed curtilage, or
any combination.
771
812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $10,000 or more
but less than $50,000.
772
812.015 3rd Retail theft; property stolen
(8)(a) & (c)- is valued at $750 or more and
(e) one or more specified acts.
773
812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
774
812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons.
775
Page 51 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or
trafficking in.
776
812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets.
777
812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching.
778
812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or
conducting a chop shop.
779
817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value
$20,000 to $50,000.
780
817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value
$20,000 or more but less than
$100,000.
781
817.2341(1), 3rd Filing false financial
(2)(a) & statements, making false
(3)(a) entries of material fact or
false statements regarding
property values relating to the
solvency of an insuring entity.
782
817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal
Page 52 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
identification information;
value of benefit, services
received, payment avoided, or
amount of injury or fraud,
$5,000 or more or use of
personal identification
information of 10 or more
persons.
783
817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
784
817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent
use of scanning device,
skimming device, or reencoder.
785
825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
in the presence of an elderly
person or disabled adult.
786
828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent
to inflict intense pain,
serious physical injury, or
death.
Page 53 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
787
836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes
for financial gain a sexually
explicit image of an
identifiable person without
consent.
788
839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an
individual in the care and
custody of a state agency
involving great bodily harm or
death.
789
843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to
person; resist arrest with
violence.
790
847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
using computer; offender 18
years or older.
791
847.0137 3rd Transmission of pornography by
(2) & (3) electronic device or equipment.
792
847.0138 3rd Transmission of material
Page 54 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
(2) & (3) harmful to minors to a minor by
electronic device or equipment.
793
849.02(3) 2nd Agents or employees of keeper
of gambling house, 3rd or
subsequent offense.
794
849.03(2) 2nd Renting house for gambling
purposes.
795
849.15(3)(c) 2nd Manufacture, sale, or
possession of a slot machine;
by a person of authority of
five or more machines or two or
more prior convictions.
796
849.157(2) 2nd False or misleading statement
to facilitate sale of slot
machines or devices; five or
more machines.
797
849.25(3) 2nd Bookmaking; second or
subsequent offense.
798
874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
Page 55 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
another to join a criminal
gang; second or subsequent
offense.
799
874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 years of age to
join a criminal gang.
800
893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs).
801
893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
Page 56 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
community center.
802
893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
university.
803
893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within
1,000 feet of property used for
religious services or a
specified business site.
804
893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
Page 57 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
public housing facility.
805
893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
806
893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
807
808 (g) LEVEL 7
809
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
810
316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death,
failure to stop; leaving scene.
811
316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily
injury.
812
316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury
or death to another person;
driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
Page 58 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
813
327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious
bodily injury.
814
402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and
negligence or intentional act
resulting in great bodily harm,
permanent disfiguration,
permanent disability, or death.
815
409.920 3rd Medicaid provider fraud;
(2)(b)1.a. $10,000 or less.
816
409.920 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more
(2)(b)1.b. than $10,000, but less than
$50,000.
817
456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care
profession without a license.
818
456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care
Page 59 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
profession without a license
which results in serious bodily
injury.
819
458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a
license.
820
459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine
without a license.
821
460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic
medicine without a license.
822
461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine
without a license.
823
462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without
a license.
824
463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a
license.
825
464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a
license.
826
Page 60 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a
license.
827
466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental
hygiene without a license.
828
467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a
license.
829
468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care
services without a license.
830
483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical
laboratory personnel without a
license.
831
483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics
without a license.
832
484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical
devices without a prescription.
833
484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without
a license.
834
Page 61 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of
chapter 494 in which the total
money and property unlawfully
obtained exceeded $50,000 and
there were five or more
victims.
835
560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or
payment instruments exceeding
$300 but less than $20,000 by a
money services business.
836
560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by
unauthorized person, currency
or payment instruments
exceeding $300 but less than
$20,000.
837
655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000 by financial
institution.
838
775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to
register; failure to renew
Page 62 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
driver license or
identification card; other
registration violations.
839
775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where
children regularly congregate.
840
775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual predator; harbor or
conceal a sexual predator.
841
782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a
person by a person other than
the perpetrator or the
perpetrator of an attempted
felony.
842
782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the
act, procurement, or culpable
negligence of another
(manslaughter).
843
782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or
unborn child by the operation
Page 63 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
of a motor vehicle in a
reckless manner (vehicular
homicide).
844
782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the
operation of a vessel in a
reckless manner (vessel
homicide).
845
784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery;
intentionally causing great
bodily harm or disfigurement.
846
784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using
deadly weapon.
847
784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator
aware victim pregnant.
848
784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of injunction or court order.
849
784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of court order.
850
Page 64 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law
enforcement officer.
851
784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually
violent predators facility
staff.
852
784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person
65 years of age or older.
853
784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified
official or employee.
854
784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
855
784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code
inspector.
856
787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child;
second or subsequent offense.
857
787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with
a specified prior conviction.
Page 65 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
858
787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
of an adult.
859
787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
by the transfer or transport of
an adult from outside Florida
to within the state.
860
790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation
subsequent to previous
conviction of s. 790.07(1) or
(2).
861
790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun
under specified circumstances.
862
790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or
deliver hoax bomb.
863
790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use any hoax
bomb while committing or
Page 66 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
attempting to commit a felony.
864
790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or
attempting to use a hoax weapon
of mass destruction.
865
790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use a hoax
weapon of mass destruction
while committing or attempting
to commit a felony.
866
790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a
person who qualifies for the
penalty enhancements provided
for in s. 874.04.
867
794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation;
consent by a parent, guardian,
or a person in custodial
authority to a victim younger
than 18 years of age.
868
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 2nd offense.
Page 67 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
869
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 3rd and subsequent
offense.
870
800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim younger than 12 years of
age; offender younger than 18
years of age.
871
800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years of
age; offender 18 years of age
or older.
872
800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years;
offender 18 years or older;
prior conviction for specified
sex offense.
873
806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by
fire or explosive.
Page 68 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
874
810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
875
810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied
dwelling; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
876
810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied
conveyance; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
877
810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized
emergency vehicle.
878
812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at
$100,000 or more or a
semitrailer deployed by a law
enforcement officer; property
stolen while causing other
property damage; 1st degree
grand theft.
879
812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued
at less than $50,000, grand
Page 69 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
theft in 2nd degree.
880
812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency
medical equipment; 2nd degree
grand theft.
881
812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law
enforcement equipment from
authorized emergency vehicle.
882
812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree;
firearm with previous
conviction of s.
812.014(2)(c)5.
883
812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $50,000 or more.
884
812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates,
organizes, plans, etc., the
theft of property and traffics
in stolen property.
885
812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching.
886
Page 70 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly
weapon, or other weapon.
887
817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value
greater than $50,000.
888
817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle
accident victims with intent to
defraud.
889
817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or
participating in an intentional
motor vehicle collision.
890
817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value
$100,000 or more.
891
817.2341 1st Making false entries of
(2)(b) & material fact or false
(3)(b) statements regarding property
values relating to the solvency
of an insuring entity which are
a significant cause of the
insolvency of that entity.
892
Page 71 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or
advertising personal protective
equipment with intent to
defraud.
893
817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a
vaccine with intent to defraud.
894
817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other
unauthorized document.
895
817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
896
825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or
disabled adult causing great
bodily harm, disability, or
disfigurement.
897
825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at $10,000 or more, but
less than $50,000.
898
Page 72 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing
great bodily harm, disability,
or disfigurement.
899
827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under
16 years of age by person 21
years of age or older.
900
827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a
sexual performance, or promote
or direct such performance.
901
827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote
any photographic material,
motion picture, etc., which
includes child pornography.
902
837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about
alleged capital felony to a law
enforcement officer.
903
838.015 2nd Bribery.
904
838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward
for official behavior.
Page 73 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
905
838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public
servant.
906
838.22 2nd Bid tampering.
907
843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public
officer or employee.
908
843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal
process.
909
843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public
officer or employee.
910
847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a
computer service, to commit an
unlawful sex act.
911
847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to
commit an unlawful sex act.
912
849.155 1st Trafficking in slot machines or
devices or any parts thereof.
913
Page 74 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body.
914
874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 to join a
criminal gang; second or
subsequent offense.
915
874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes,
plans, finances, directs,
manages, or supervises criminal
gang-related activity.
916
893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
917
893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
Page 75 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
cocaine or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.,
within 1,000 feet of property
used for religious services or
a specified business site.
918
893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
919
893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more
than 25 lbs., less than 2,000
lbs.
920
893.135 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more
(1)(b)1.a. than 28 grams, less than 200
grams.
921
893.135 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs,
(1)(c)1.a. more than 4 grams, less than 14
grams.
922
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28
Page 76 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
(1)(c)2.a. grams or more, less than 50
grams.
923
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50
(1)(c)2.b. grams or more, less than 100
grams.
924
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7
(1)(c)3.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
925
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14
(1)(c)3.b. grams or more, less than 25
grams.
926
893.135 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4
(1)(c)4.b.(I) grams or more, less than 14
grams.
927
893.135 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine,
(1)(d)1.a. 28 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
928
893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone,
200 grams or more, less than 5
Page 77 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
kilograms.
929
893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14
grams or more, less than 28
grams.
930
893.135 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4
(1)(g)1.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
931
893.135 1st Trafficking in gamma-
(1)(h)1.a. hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1
kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
932
893.135 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol,
(1)(j)1.a. 1 kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
933
893.135 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines,
(1)(k)2.a. 10 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
934
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.a. cannabinoids, 280 grams or
Page 78 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
more, less than 500 grams.
935
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.b. cannabinoids, 500 grams or
more, less than 1,000 grams.
936
893.135 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl
(1)(n)2.a. phenethylamines, 14 grams or
more, less than 100 grams.
937
893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
938
896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
939
896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to
evade reporting or registration
requirements, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
940
943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating
Page 79 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
permanent residence; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
941
943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in
state after indicating intent
to leave; failure to comply
with reporting requirements.
942
943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
943
943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
944
943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
945
944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
Page 80 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
comply with reporting
requirements.
946
944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
947
944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
948
944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
949
985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
950
985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
Page 81 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
conceal a sexual offender.
951
985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
952
953 Section 22. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraph
954 (a) of subsection (2) of section 772.102, Florida Statutes, are
955 amended to read:
956 772.102 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
957 (1) "Criminal activity" means to commit, to attempt to
958 commit, to conspire to commit, or to solicit, coerce, or
959 intimidate another person to commit:
960 (a) Any crime that is chargeable by indictment or
961 information under the following provisions:
962 1. Section 210.18, relating to evasion of payment of
963 cigarette taxes.
964 2. Section 414.39, relating to public assistance fraud.
965 3. Section 440.105 or s. 440.106, relating to workers'
966 compensation.
967 4. Part IV of chapter 501, relating to telemarketing.
968 5. Chapter 517, relating to securities transactions.
969 6. Section 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing
Page 82 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
970 and horseracing.
971 7. Chapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons.
972 8. Chapter 552, relating to the manufacture, distribution,
973 and use of explosives.
974 9. Chapter 562, relating to beverage law enforcement.
975 10. Section 624.401, relating to transacting insurance
976 without a certificate of authority, s. 624.437(4)(c)1., relating
977 to operating an unauthorized multiple-employer welfare
978 arrangement, or s. 626.902(1)(b), relating to representing or
979 aiding an unauthorized insurer.
980 11. Chapter 687, relating to interest and usurious
981 practices.
982 12. Section 721.08, s. 721.09, or s. 721.13, relating to
983 real estate timeshare plans.
984 13. Chapter 782, relating to homicide.
985 14. Chapter 784, relating to assault and battery.
986 15. Chapter 787, relating to kidnapping or human
987 trafficking.
988 16. Chapter 790, relating to weapons and firearms.
989 17. Former s. 796.03, s. 796.04, s. 796.05, or s. 796.07,
990 relating to prostitution.
991 18. Chapter 806, relating to arson.
992 19. Section 810.02(2)(c), relating to specified burglary
993 of a dwelling or structure.
994 20. Chapter 812, relating to theft, robbery, and related
Page 83 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
995 crimes.
996 21. Chapter 815, relating to computer-related crimes.
997 22. Chapter 817, relating to fraudulent practices, false
998 pretenses, fraud generally, and credit card crimes.
999 23. Section 827.071, relating to commercial sexual
1000 exploitation of children.
1001 24. Chapter 831, relating to forgery and counterfeiting.
1002 25. Chapter 832, relating to issuance of worthless checks
1003 and drafts.
1004 26. Section 836.05, relating to extortion.
1005 27. Chapter 837, relating to perjury.
1006 28. Chapter 838, relating to bribery and misuse of public
1007 office.
1008 29. Chapter 843, relating to obstruction of justice.
1009 30. Section 847.011, s. 847.012, s. 847.013, s. 847.06, or
1010 s. 847.07, relating to obscene literature and profanity.
1011 31. Section 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s.
1012 849.25, relating to gambling.
1013 32. Chapter 893, relating to drug abuse prevention and
1014 control.
1015 33. Section 914.22 or s. 914.23, relating to witnesses,
1016 victims, or informants.
1017 34. Section 918.12, s. 918.125, or s. 918.13, relating to
1018 tampering with or harassing court officials, retaliating against
1019 court officials, and tampering with evidence.
Page 84 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
1020 (2) "Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of
1021 value constituting principal or interest of a debt that is
1022 legally unenforceable in this state in whole or in part because
1023 the debt was incurred or contracted:
1024 (a) In violation of any one of the following provisions of
1025 law:
1026 1. Section 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing
1027 and horseracing.
1028 2. Chapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons.
1029 3. Section 687.071, relating to criminal usury and loan
1030 sharking.
1031 4. Section 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s.
1032 849.25, relating to gambling.
1033 Section 23. Paragraph (a) of subsection (12) of section
1034 895.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1035 895.02 Definitions.—As used in ss. 895.01-895.08, the
1036 term:
1037 (12) "Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of
1038 value constituting principal or interest of a debt that is
1039 legally unenforceable in this state in whole or in part because
1040 the debt was incurred or contracted:
1041 (a) In violation of any one of the following provisions of
1042 law:
1043 1. Section 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing
1044 and horseracing.
Page 85 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 591 2026
1045 2. Chapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons.
1046 3. Section 551.109, relating to slot machine gaming.
1047 4. Chapter 687, relating to interest and usury.
1048 5. Section 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s.
1049 849.25, relating to gambling.
1050 Section 24. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 86 of 86
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb591-00